Hawaii statutes.
§128D-2 Environmental response revolving
fund; uses. (a) There is created within the state treasury an
environmental response revolving fund, which shall consist of moneys
appropriated to the fund by the legislature, moneys paid to the fund as a
result of departmental compliance proceedings, moneys paid to the fund pursuant
to court-ordered awards or judgments, moneys paid to the fund in court-approved
or out-of-court settlements, all interest attributable to investment of money
deposited in the fund, moneys deposited in the fund from the environmental
response, energy, and food security tax pursuant to section 243-3.5, and moneys
allotted to the fund from other sources.

(b) Moneys from the fund shall be
expended by the department for the following:

(1) Removal, remediation, and detection of oil and
pollutant or contaminant releases;

(2) Removal and remediation of hazardous waste and
any other solid, liquid, or gaseous substance that may harm the environment;
and

(3) The payment of costs listed under section
128D-4(c).

(c) The unexpended and unencumbered moneys in
the fund in excess of $1,250,000 on June 30 of each fiscal year shall be
transferred by the director of finance into and become a realization of the
general fund on that date. [L 1988, c 148, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 298, pt of
§18; am L 1991, c 157, §8 and c 280, §3; am L 1992, c 259, §2; am L 1993, c
300, §4; am L 1994, c 205, §1; am L 1997, c 260, §2; am L 1998, c 141, §8; am L
2000, c 245, §1; am L 2008, c 208, §4; am L 2010, c 73, §§2, 14; am L 2014, c
107, §3(2); am L 2015, c 185, §§4, 6]

Note

Reports on fund expenditures, encumbrances, and revenues to
2016-2017 legislature. L 2015, c 185, §9.

Cross References

Raising the legislative ceiling of the fund, see §128D-4(e).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next